Hawaii statutes.
[§291C-5] Safe routes to school program
surcharge. (a) In addition to any other civil
penalties ordered by the court, a person who violates any provision under part X shall be ordered to pay a safe routes to
school program surcharge of $10 if the violator is not already required to pay
a safe routes to school program surcharge for the violation.

(b) The person shall
pay the surcharge to the clerk of the court. The surcharge shall be deposited
with the director of finance who shall transmit the surcharge to the safe
routes to school program special fund established under section 291C-4. [L
2012, c 317, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next